Utah statutes.
65A-5-1.   Sovereign Lands Management Account -- Creation -- Contents -- Appropriation to fund division expenses -- Balance.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Sovereign Lands Management Account.

(2)  The account shall consist of the following:

(a)  all revenues derived from  sovereign lands; and

(b)  that portion of all revenues derived from mineral leases on other lands managed by the division necessary to recover management costs.

(3)  All expenditures of the division relating directly to the management of state lands shall be funded by appropriation by the Legislature from the  Sovereign Lands Management Account or other sources.

(4)  As of June 30 of each calendar year, the unappropriated portion of the Sovereign Lands Management Account from the fiscal year ending June 30 of that calendar year shall be nonlapsing and available for appropriation by the Legislature.

